Utah statutes.
58-37-21.   Admissibility of Utah State Crime Laboratory documents -- Drug analysis in criminal pretrial proceedings.

The commissioner of the Department of Public Safety shall establish standards for administration and interpretation of chemical and forensic analysis in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, of:

(1)  controlled substances as provided in Title 58, Chapter 37;

(2)  drug paraphernalia as provided in Title 58, Chapter 37a;

(3)  imitation controlled substances as provided in Title 58, Chapter 37b; and

(4)  controlled substance precursors as provided in Title 58, Chapter 37d.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

